Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.200

Liability for use of escheated property.

If any person shall take possession of escheat property without proper authorization to do so, and shall have the use thereof for a period exceeding sixty days, he or she shall be liable to the state for the reasonable value of such use, payment of which may be enforced by the department of revenue or by the administrator of the estate.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2008; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 4; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.200. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 8.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.